Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 37 Health Care Personnel

31-37-1 through 31-37-3.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 11, effective July 1, 1999, repealed and reserved the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter. The former chapter, relating to health care personnel, consisted of Code Sections 31-37-1 through 31-37-3 and was based on Ga. L. 1990, p. 1051, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31; repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 11, effective July 1, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 11 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 1999.